Maryland, session 2026, HB0021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
SUBTITLE 10. SOCIAL MEDIA VLOGGERS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0021*

HOUSE BILL 21
19–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CHILD” MEANS, WITH RESPECT TO A VLOGGER:
(1) A MINOR FOR WHOM THE VLOGGER IS A PARENT OR GUARDIAN; OR
(2) IF THE VLOGGER IS A BUSINESS ENTITY, A MINOR WHOSE PARENT
OR LEGAL GUARDIAN HAS AN INTEREST IN THE BUSINESS ENTITY.
(C) “FEATURE” MEANS TO USE THE LIKENESS OR NAME OF AN INDIVIDUAL
OR TO CAUSE AN INDIVIDUAL TO BE THE SUBJECT OF A NARRATIVE.
(D) “VLOGGER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL OR A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT
CREATES VIDEO CONTENT TO BE POSTED ON A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM IN
EXCHANGE FOR COMPENSATION.
19–1002.
A VLOGGER THAT FEATURES A CHILD IN THE VLOGGER’S VIDEO CONTENT
SHALL COMPENSATE THE CHILD IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 19–1003 OF THIS SUBTITLE
IF AT ANY TIME WITHIN THE PREVIOUS 12–MONTH PERIOD:
(1) (I) THE VLOGGER QUALIFIED FOR COMPENSATION FROM A
SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM BASED ON THE NUMBER OF VIEWS ANY OF THE VLOGGER’S
VIDEO CONTENT RECEIVED; OR
(II) THE VLOGGER ACTUALLY RECEIVED COMPENSATION OF AT
LEAST 10 CENTS PER VIEW FOR ANY OF THE VLOGGER’S VIDEO CONTENT; AND
(2) THE CHILD WAS FEATURED FOR AT LEAST 30% OF THE TOTAL
DURATION OF ALL CONTENT POSTED WITHIN ANY 30–DAY PERIOD.
19–1003.
A VLOGGER REQUIRED TO COMPENSATE ONE OR MORE CHILDREN UNDER §
19–1002 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL PAY INTO SEPARATE TRUSTS, EACH TRUST FOR
THE BENEFIT OF A SINGLE CHILD ON ATTAINING THE AGE OF 18 YEARS, AS FOLLOWS:

HOUSE BILL 21 3
(1) IF THE VLOGGER IS REQUIRED TO COMPENSATE ONE CHILD, THE
PERCENTAGE OF GROSS EARNINGS ATTRIBUTABLE TO CONTENT IN WHICH THE
CHILD WAS FEATURED SHALL BE PAID INTO THE TRUST FOR THE CHILD; AND
(2) IF THE VLOGGER IS REQUIRED TO COMPENSATE MORE THAN ONE
CHILD, THE PERCENTAGE OF GROSS EARNINGS ATTRIBUTABLE TO CONTENT IN
WHICH AT LEAST ONE OF THOSE CHILDREN WAS FEATURED SHALL BE DIVIDED
EQUALLY AMONG THE CHILDREN AND PAID INTO THE SEPARATE TRUST FOR EACH
CHILD.
19–1004.
(A) AN ADULT WHO WAS FEATURED IN VIDEO CONTENT OF A VLOGGER AS A
CHILD ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, MAY REQUEST THE PERMANENT DELETION
OF THE CONTENT.
(B) A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM THAT RECEIVES A DELETION REQUEST
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE ALL REASONABLE STEPS TO
PERMANENTLY DELETE ALL CONTENT FOR WHICH THE REQUEST WAS MADE.
(C) A CONTRACT BETWEEN A VLOGGER AND A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM
FOR THE CREATION OF VIDEO CONTENT THAT WOULD REASONABLY BE
ANTICIPATED TO FEATURE A CHILD SHALL INCLUDE NOTIFICATION TO THE SOCIAL
MEDIA PLATFORM OF THE RIGHTS OF THE CHILD UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–203.
This subtitle does not apply to an activity that a minor performs if the activity:
(4) is limited to:
(i) farm work that is performed on a farm;
(ii) domestic work that is performed in or about a home;
(iii) work that is performed in a business that a parent of the minor
or a person standing in place of the parent owns or operates, OTHER THAN WORK
PERFORMED BY A MINOR WHO IS REQUIRED TO BE COMPENSATED BY A VLOGGER
UNDER TITLE 19, SUBTITLE 10 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE;
(iv) caddying on a golf course;
(v) instructing on an instructional sailboat;

HOUSE BILL 21
(vi) delivery of newspapers to consumers;
(vii) making an evergreen wreath in or about a home;
(viii) work performed as a counselor, assistant counselor, or instructor
in a youth camp certified under the Maryland Youth Camp Act; or
(ix) work that is performed as an unpaid volunteer in a charitable or
nonprofit organization, if:
1. a parent of the minor or a person standing in the place of
the parent consents in writing; and
2. for hazardous work in a volunteer fire department or
company or volunteer rescue squad, the minor:
A. is at least 16 years old; and
B. has completed or is taking a course of study about
firefighting or rescue.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.